Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 2 Acts Void as Against Creditors

18-2-20.
Rights of creditors to be favored by courts.

The rights of creditors shall be favored by the courts; and every remedy and facility shall be afforded them to detect, defeat, and annul any effort to defraud them of their just rights.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1947; Code 1868, § 1935; Code 1873, § 1945; Code 1882, § 1945; Civil Code 1895, § 2687; Civil Code 1910, § 3216; Code 1933, § 28-102.

18-2-21.
Right of creditors to attack judgments, conveyances, or other arrangements interfering with creditors’ rights.

Creditors may attack as fraudulent a judgment, conveyance, or any other arrangement interfering with their rights, either at law or in equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1949; Code 1868, § 1937; Code 1873, § 1947; Code 1882, § 1947; Civil Code 1895, § 2689; Civil Code 1910, § 3218; Code 1933, § 28-104.

18-2-22.
[Reserved] Conveyances by debtors deemed fraudulent.

History.

Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 29, § 1; Code 1868, § 1942; Code 1873, § 1952; Code 1882, § 1952; Civil Code 1895, § 2695; Civil Code 1910, § 3224; Code 1933, § 28-201; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 18; repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 2, effective July 1, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 2 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2002. For present comparable provisions, see T. 18, C. 2, A. 4.

18-2-23.
[Reserved] Validity of conveyance to innocent subsequent purchaser.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 2696; Civil Code 1910, § 3225; Code 1933, § 28-202; repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 2, effective July 1, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 141, § 2 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2002.

18-2-24.
Effect of giving debtor permission to exercise control or use of property as security for any debt.

Where any property is conveyed, assigned, or mortgaged as security for any debt and permission is given to the debtor to exercise dominion over or to use the property or the proceeds thereof or any part thereof, the giving of such permission shall not cause the conveyance, assignment, or mortgage to be deemed fraudulent or to create a presumption of fraud as to creditors.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 154, § 1.

18-2-25.
Effect of misrepresentation or private agreement giving preference upon settlement between debtor and creditor.

If a debtor misrepresents or suppresses any material fact in the statement of his affairs either as to the amount of his property or of his indebtedness, the composition shall be void. If a debtor privately agrees to give a creditor better security or to pay a creditor more than other creditors, the contract with the others shall be void.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 2692; Civil Code 1910, § 3221; Code 1933, § 28-107.

History of Section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in
Woodruff & Co. v. Saul,

70 Ga. 271

(1883).